Maryland, session 2026, HB1441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–119.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1441*

HOUSE BILL 1441
(a) (1) A person shall be issued a citation under this section if the person
violates:
(i) §§ 10–113 through 10–115 or § 10–118 of this part; or
(ii) § 6–321 or § 6–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article.
(2) A minor who violates § 10–116 or § 10–117(a) of this part shall be issued
a citation under this section.
(b) (1) A citation for a violation of §§ 10–113 through 10–115 or a violation of
§ 10–118 of this part or § 6–321 or § 6–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article
may be issued by:
(i) a police officer authorized to make arrests;
(ii) in State forestry reservations, State parks, historic monuments,
and recreation areas, a forest or park warden under § 5–206(a) or (b) of the Natural
Resources Article; and
(iii) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, in Anne
Arundel County, Frederick County, Harford County, Howard County, Kent County,
Montgomery County, Prince George’s County, and Talbot County, and only in the
inspector’s jurisdiction, an alcoholic beverages inspector who investigates license violations
under the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article.
(2) In Anne Arundel County, Frederick County, Harford County, Howard
County, Kent County, Montgomery County, Prince George’s County, and Talbot County,
the inspector shall successfully complete an appropriate program of training in the proper
use of arrest authority and pertinent police procedures as required by the board of license
commissioners.
(3) In Anne Arundel County, Harford County, Howard County, Kent
County, Montgomery County, Prince George’s County, and Talbot County, the inspector
may not carry a firearm in the performance of the inspector’s duties.
(c) A person authorized under this section to issue a citation shall issue it if the
person has probable cause to believe that the person charged is committing or has
committed a Code violation.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the form of citation issued
to an adult shall be as prescribed by the District Court and shall be uniform throughout
the State.
(2) The citation issued to an adult shall contain:

HOUSE BILL 1441 3
(i) the name and address of the person charged;
(ii) the statute allegedly violated;
(iii) the location, date, and time that the violation occurred;
(iv) the fine that may be imposed;
(v) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM, a notice
stating that prepayment of the fine is not allowed; OR
2. FOR A VIOLATION OF § 6–321 OR § 6–322 OF THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE, A NOTICE STATING THAT
PREPAYMENT OF THE FINE IS ALLOWED AND THAT PREPAYMENT IS CONSIDERED A
PLEA OF GUILTY TO A CODE VIOLATION;
(vi) a notice that the District Court shall promptly send the person
charged a summons to appear for trial;
(vii) the signature of the person issuing the citation; and
(viii) a space for the person charged to sign the citation.
(3) The form of citation issued to a minor shall:
(i) be prescribed by the State Court Administrator;
(ii) be uniform throughout the State; and
(iii) contain the information listed in § 3–8A–33(b) of the Courts
Article.
(e) (1) Except for a citation subject to the jurisdiction of a circuit court, the
issuing jurisdiction shall forward a copy of the citation and a request for trial to the District
Court in the district having venue.
(2) (i) [The] EXCEPT FOR A CITATION ISSUED FOR A VIOLATION OF
§ 6–321 OR § 6–322 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE, THE
District Court shall promptly schedule the case for trial and summon the defendant to
appear.
(ii) [Willful] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS
SECTION, WILLFUL failure of the defendant to respond to the summons is contempt of
court.

HOUSE BILL 1441
(f) (1) For purposes of this section, a violation of §§ 10–113 through 10–115 or
a violation of § 10–118 of this part or § 6–321 or § 6–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article is a Code violation and is a civil offense.
(2) A person charged who is under the age of 18 years shall be subject to
the procedures and dispositions provided in Title 3, Subtitle 8A of the Courts Article.
(3) A person charged who is at least 18 years old shall be subject to the
provisions of this section.
(4) Adjudication of a Code violation is not a criminal conviction for any
purpose, and it does not impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by a criminal
conviction.
(g) In any proceeding for a Code violation:
(1) the State has the burden to prove the guilt of the defendant to the same
extent as is required by law in the trial of criminal causes, and in any such proceeding, the
court shall apply the evidentiary standards as prescribed by law or rule for the trial of
criminal causes;
(2) the court shall ensure that the defendant has received a copy of the
charges against the defendant and that the defendant understands those charges;
(3) the defendant is entitled to cross–examine all witnesses who appear
against the defendant, to produce evidence or witnesses on behalf of the defendant, or to
testify on the defendant’s own behalf, if the defendant chooses to do so;
(4) the defendant is entitled to be represented by counsel of the defendant’s
choice and at the expense of the defendant;
(5) the defendant may enter a plea of guilty or not guilty, and the verdict
of the court in the case shall be:
(i) guilty of a Code violation; or
(ii) not guilty of a Code violation; and
(6) before rendering judgment, the court may place the defendant on
probation in the same manner and to the same extent as is allowed by law in the trial of a
criminal case.
(h) (1) This subsection does not apply to a person who commits a Code
violation under § 6–321 or § 6–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article.

HOUSE BILL 1441 5
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the District
Court finds that a person has committed a Code violation, the court shall require the person
to pay:
(i) a fine not exceeding $500; or
(ii) if the violation is a subsequent violation, a fine not exceeding
$1,000.
(3) If the District Court finds that a person has committed a Code violation
under § 10–117 of this subtitle, the court shall require the person to pay:
(i) a fine not exceeding $2,500; or
(ii) if the violation is a subsequent violation, a fine not exceeding
$5,000.
(4) The Chief Judge of the District Court may not establish a schedule for
the prepayment of fines for a Code violation under this part.
(i) (1) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS COMMITTED
A CODE VIOLATION UNDER § 6–321 OR § 6–322 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND
CANNABIS ARTICLE, THE COURT MAY REQUIRE THE PERSON TO PAY A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $100.
(2) THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ESTABLISH A
SCHEDULE FOR THE PREPAYMENT OF FINES FOR A CODE VIOLATION UNDER § 6–321
OR § 6–322 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(3) PREPAYMENT OF A FINE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
CONSIDERED A PLEA OF GUILTY TO A CODE VIOLATION.
(4) A PERSON ISSUED A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 6–321 OR §
6–322 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE MAY REQUEST A
HEARING WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CITATION’S ISSUANCE.
(5) IF A PERSON ISSUED A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 6–321 OR
§ 6–322 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE DOES NOT
PREPAY THE FINE, DOES NOT REQUEST A HEARING, AND DOES NOT RESPOND TO THE
SUMMONS, THE COURT MAY HOLD A HEARING, AND IF THE EVIDENCE SUPPORTS A
GUILTY VERDICT, IMPOSE UP TO THE MAXIMUM FINE AND COURT COSTS AGAINST
THE PERSON AND FIND THE PERSON GUILTY OF A CODE VIOLATION.
(J) When a defendant has been found guilty of a Code violation and a fine has
been imposed by the court:

HOUSE BILL 1441
(1) the court may direct that the payment of the fine be suspended or
deferred under conditions that the court may establish; and
(2) if the defendant willfully fails to pay the fine imposed by the court, that
willful failure may be treated as a criminal contempt of court, for which the defendant may
be punished by the court as provided by law.
[(j)] (K) (1) The defendant is liable for the costs of the proceedings in the
District Court and for payment to the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund.
(2) The court costs in a Code violation case in which costs are imposed are
$5.
[(k)] (L) (1) In this subsection, “driver’s license” means a license or permit to
drive a motor vehicle that is issued under the laws of this State or any other jurisdiction.
(2) This subsection applies only to:
(i) a person who is at least 18 but under 21 years of age; or
(ii) a minor if the minor is subject to the jurisdiction of the court.
(3) If a person is found guilty of a Code violation under § 10–113 of this
part that involved the use of a driver’s license or a document purporting to be a driver’s
license, the court shall notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of the violation.
(4) The Chief Judge of the District Court, in conjunction with the Motor
Vehicle Administrator, shall establish uniform procedures for reporting Code violations
described in this subsection.
[(l)] (M) (1) A defendant who has been found guilty of a Code violation has
the right to appeal or to file a motion for a new trial or a motion for a revision of a judgment
provided by law in the trial of a criminal case.
(2) A motion shall be made in the same manner as provided in the trial of
criminal cases, and the court, in ruling on the motion has the same authority provided in
the trial of criminal cases.
[(m)] (N) (1) The State’s Attorney for any county may prosecute a Code
violation in the same manner as prosecution of a violation of the criminal laws of this State.
(2) In a Code violation case the State’s Attorney may:
(i) enter a nolle prosequi in or place the case on the stet docket; and

HOUSE BILL 1441 7
(ii) exercise authority in the same manner as prescribed by law for
violation of the criminal laws of this State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.